oo/vimspell/eo.aff
SFX G Y 632
SFX G a igi a
SFX G a igas a
SFX G a igis a
SFX G a igos a
SFX G a igus a
SFX G a igu a
SFX G a iginta a
SFX G a igintaj a
SFX G a igintajn a
SFX G a igintan a
SFX G a iginte a
SFX G a igint’ a
SFX G a igint' a
SFX G a iginto a
SFX G a igintoj a
SFX G a igintojn a
SFX G a iginton a
SFX G a iganta a
SFX G a igantaj a
SFX G a igantajn a
SFX G a igantan a
SFX G a igante a
SFX G a igant’ a
SFX G a igant' a
SFX G a iganto a
SFX G a igantoj a
SFX G a igantojn a
SFX G a iganton a
SFX G a igonta a
SFX G a igontaj a
SFX G a igontajn a
SFX G a igontan a
SFX G a igonte a
SFX G a igont’ a
SFX G a igont' a
SFX G a igonto a
SFX G a igontoj a
SFX G a igontojn a
SFX G a igonton a
SFX G a igintina a
SFX G a igintinaj a
SFX G a igintinajn a
SFX G a igintinan a
SFX G a igintin’ a
SFX G a igintin' a
SFX G a igintino a
SFX G a igintinoj a
SFX G a igintinojn a
SFX G a igintinon a
SFX G a igantina a
SFX G a igantinaj a
SFX G a igantinajn a
SFX G a igantinan a
SFX G a igantin’ a
SFX G a igantin' a
SFX G a igantino a
SFX G a igantinoj a
SFX G a igantinojn a
SFX G a igantinon a
SFX G a igontina a
SFX G a igontinaj a
SFX G a igontinajn a
SFX G a igontinan a
SFX G a igontin’ a
SFX G a igontin' a
SFX G a igontino a
SFX G a igontinoj a
SFX G a igontinojn a
SFX G a igontinon a
SFX G a iga a
SFX G a igaj a
SFX G a igajn a
SFX G a igan a
SFX G a ige a
SFX G a ig’ a
SFX G a ig' a
SFX G a igo a
SFX G a igoj a
SFX G a igojn a
SFX G a igon a
SFX G a igita a
SFX G a igitaj a
SFX G a igitajn a
SFX G a igitan a
SFX G a igite a
SFX G a igit’ a
SFX G a igit' a
SFX G a igito a
SFX G a igitoj a
SFX G a igitojn a
SFX G a igiton a
SFX G a igata a
SFX G a igataj a
SFX G a igatajn a
SFX G a igatan a
SFX G a igate a
SFX G a igat’ a
SFX G a igat' a
SFX G a igato a
SFX G a igatoj a
SFX G a igatojn a
SFX G a igaton a
SFX G a igota a
SFX G a igotaj a
SFX G a igotajn a
SFX G a igotan a
SFX G a igote a
SFX G a igot’ a
SFX G a igot' a
SFX G a igoto a
SFX G a igotoj a
SFX G a igotojn a
SFX G a igoton a
SFX G a igeblas a
SFX G a igeblis a
SFX G a igeblos a
SFX G a igeblus a
SFX G a igebla a
SFX G a igeblaj a
SFX G a igeblajn a
SFX G a igeblan a
SFX G a igeble a
SFX G a igebl’ a
SFX G a igebl' a
SFX G a igeblo a
SFX G a igeblon a
SFX G a igendas a
SFX G a igendis a
SFX G a igendos a
SFX G a igendus a
SFX G a igenda a
SFX G a igendaj a
SFX G a igendajn a
SFX G a igendan a
SFX G a igende a
SFX G a igend’ a
SFX G a igend' a
SFX G a igendo a
SFX G a igendoj a
SFX G a igendojn a
SFX G a igendon a
SFX G a igadi a
SFX G a igadas a
SFX G a igadis a
SFX G a igados a
SFX G a igadus a
SFX G a igadu a
SFX G a igada a
SFX G a igadaj a
SFX G a igadajn a
SFX G a igadan a
SFX G a igade a
SFX G a igad’ a
SFX G a igad' a
SFX G a igado a
SFX G a igadoj a
SFX G a igadojn a
SFX G a igadon a
SFX G 0 gada i
SFX G 0 gadaj i
SFX G 0 gadajn i
SFX G 0 gadan i
SFX G 0 gade i
SFX G 0 gad’ i
SFX G 0 gad' i
SFX G 0 gado i
SFX G 0 gadoj i
SFX G 0 gadojn i
SFX G 0 gadon i
SFX G 0 gadi i
SFX G 0 gadas i
SFX G 0 gadis i
SFX G 0 gados i
SFX G 0 gadus i
SFX G 0 gadu i
SFX G 0 gi i
SFX G 0 gas i
SFX G 0 gis i
SFX G 0 gos i
SFX G 0 gus i
SFX G 0 gu i
SFX G 0 ginta i
SFX G 0 gintaj i
SFX G 0 gintajn i
SFX G 0 gintan i
SFX G 0 ginte i
SFX G 0 gint’ i
SFX G 0 gint' i
SFX G 0 ginto i
SFX G 0 gintoj i
SFX G 0 gintojn i
SFX G 0 ginton i
SFX G 0 ganta i
SFX G 0 gantaj i
SFX G 0 gantajn i
SFX G 0 gantan i
SFX G 0 gante i
SFX G 0 gant’ i
SFX G 0 gant' i
SFX G 0 ganto i
SFX G 0 gantoj i
SFX G 0 gantojn i
SFX G 0 ganton i
SFX G 0 gonta i
SFX G 0 gontaj i
SFX G 0 gontajn i
SFX G 0 gontan i
SFX G 0 gonte i
SFX G 0 gont’ i
SFX G 0 gont' i
SFX G 0 gonto i
SFX G 0 gontoj i
SFX G 0 gontojn i
SFX G 0 gonton i
SFX G 0 gintina i
SFX G 0 gintinaj i
SFX G 0 gintinajn i
SFX G 0 gintinan i
SFX G 0 gintin’ i
SFX G 0 gintin' i
SFX G 0 gintino i
SFX G 0 gintinoj i
SFX G 0 gintinojn i
SFX G 0 gintinon i
SFX G 0 gantina i
SFX G 0 gantinaj i
SFX G 0 gantinajn i
SFX G 0 gantinan i
SFX G 0 gantin’ i
SFX G 0 gantin' i
SFX G 0 gantino i
SFX G 0 gantinoj i
SFX G 0 gantinojn i
SFX G 0 gantinon i
SFX G 0 gontina i
SFX G 0 gontinaj i
SFX G 0 gontinajn i
SFX G 0 gontinan i
SFX G 0 gontin’ i
SFX G 0 gontin' i
SFX G 0 gontino i
SFX G 0 gontinoj i
SFX G 0 gontinojn i
SFX G 0 gontinon i
SFX G 0 ga i
SFX G 0 gaj i
SFX G 0 gajn i
SFX G 0 gan i
SFX G 0 ge i
SFX G 0 g’ i
SFX G 0 g' i
SFX G 0 go i
SFX G 0 goj i
SFX G 0 gojn i
SFX G 0 gon i
SFX G 0 gita i
SFX G 0 gitaj i
SFX G 0 gitajn i
SFX G 0 gitan i
SFX G 0 gite i
SFX G 0 git’ i
SFX G 0 git' i
SFX G 0 gito i
SFX G 0 gitoj i
SFX G 0 gitojn i
SFX G 0 giton i
SFX G 0 gata i
SFX G 0 gataj i
SFX G 0 gatajn i
SFX G 0 gatan i
SFX G 0 gate i
SFX G 0 gat’ i
SFX G 0 gat' i
SFX G 0 gato i
SFX G 0 gatoj i
SFX G 0 gatojn i
SFX G 0 gaton i
SFX G 0 gota i
SFX G 0 gotaj i
SFX G 0 gotajn i
SFX G 0 gotan i
SFX G 0 gote i
SFX G 0 got’ i
SFX G 0 got' i
SFX G 0 goto i
SFX G 0 gotoj i
SFX G 0 gotojn i
SFX G 0 goton i
SFX G 0 geblas i
SFX G 0 geblis i
SFX G 0 geblos i
SFX G 0 geblus i
SFX G 0 gebla i
SFX G 0 geblaj i
SFX G 0 geblajn i
SFX G 0 geblan i
SFX G 0 geble i
SFX G 0 gebl’ i
SFX G 0 gebl' i
SFX G 0 geblo i
SFX G 0 geblon i
SFX G 0 gendas i
SFX G 0 gendis i
SFX G 0 gendos i
SFX G 0 gendus i
SFX G 0 genda i
SFX G 0 gendaj i
SFX G 0 gendajn i
SFX G 0 gendan i
SFX G 0 gende i
SFX G 0 gend’ i
SFX G 0 gend' i
SFX G 0 gendo i
SFX G 0 gendoj i
SFX G 0 gendojn i
SFX G 0 gendon i
SFX G u igada u
SFX G u igadaj u
SFX G u igadajn u
SFX G u igadan u
SFX G u igade u
SFX G u igad’ u
SFX G u igad' u
SFX G u igado u
SFX G u igadoj u
SFX G u igadojn u
SFX G u igadon u
SFX G u igadi u
SFX G u igadas u
SFX G u igadis u
SFX G u igados u
SFX G u igadus u
SFX G u igadu u
SFX G u igi u
SFX G u igas u
SFX G u igis u
SFX G u igos u
SFX G u igus u
SFX G u igu u
SFX G u iginta u
SFX G u igintaj u
SFX G u igintajn u
SFX G u igintan u
SFX G u iginte u
SFX G u igint’ u
SFX G u igint' u
SFX G u iginto u
SFX G u igintoj u
SFX G u igintojn u
SFX G u iginton u
SFX G u iganta u
SFX G u igantaj u
SFX G u igantajn u
SFX G u igantan u
SFX G u igante u
SFX G u igant’ u
SFX G u igant' u
SFX G u iganto u
SFX G u igantoj u
SFX G u igantojn u
SFX G u iganton u
SFX G u igonta u
SFX G u igontaj u
SFX G u igontajn u
SFX G u igontan u
SFX G u igonte u
SFX G u igont’ u
SFX G u igont' u
SFX G u igonto u
SFX G u igontoj u
SFX G u igontojn u
SFX G u igonton u
SFX G u igintina u
SFX G u igintinaj u
SFX G u igintinajn u
SFX G u igintinan u
SFX G u igintin’ u
SFX G u igintin' u
SFX G u igintino u
SFX G u igintinoj u
SFX G u igintinojn u
SFX G u igintinon u
SFX G u igantina u
SFX G u igantinaj u
SFX G u igantinajn u
SFX G u igantinan u
SFX G u igantin’ u
SFX G u igantin' u
SFX G u igantino u
SFX G u igantinoj u
SFX G u igantinojn u
SFX G u igantinon u
SFX G u igontina u
SFX G u igontinaj u
SFX G u igontinajn u
SFX G u igontinan u
SFX G u igontin’ u
SFX G u igontin' u
SFX G u igontino u
SFX G u igontinoj u
SFX G u igontinojn u
SFX G u igontinon u
SFX G u iga u
SFX G u igaj u
SFX G u igajn u
SFX G u igan u
SFX G u ige u
SFX G u ig’ u
SFX G u ig' u
SFX G u igo u
SFX G u igoj u
SFX G u igojn u
SFX G u igon u
SFX G u igita u
SFX G u igitaj u
SFX G u igitajn u
SFX G u igitan u
SFX G u igite u
SFX G u igit’ u
SFX G u igit' u
SFX G u igito u
SFX G u igitoj u
SFX G u igitojn u
SFX G u igiton u
SFX G u igata u
SFX G u igataj u
SFX G u igatajn u
SFX G u igatan u
SFX G u igate u
SFX G u igat’ u
SFX G u igat' u
SFX G u igato u
SFX G u igatoj u
SFX G u igatojn u
SFX G u igaton u
SFX G u igota u
SFX G u igotaj u
SFX G u igotajn u
SFX G u igotan u
SFX G u igote u
SFX G u igot’ u
SFX G u igot' u
SFX G u igoto u
SFX G u igotoj u
SFX G u igotojn u
SFX G u igoton u
SFX G u igeblas u
SFX G u igeblis u
SFX G u igeblos u
SFX G u igeblus u
SFX G u igebla u
SFX G u igeblaj u
SFX G u igeblajn u
SFX G u igeblan u
SFX G u igeble u
SFX G u igebl’ u
SFX G u igebl' u
SFX G u igeblo u
SFX G u igeblon u
SFX G u igendas u
SFX G u igendis u
SFX G u igendos u
SFX G u igendus u
SFX G u igenda u
SFX G u igendaj u
SFX G u igendajn u
