oo/vimspell/eo.dic
aborta/ABGLOVY
absurda/ACGOVBY
acideta/AGOQ
adepta/AGOQ
adulti/AFGOUV
agrabla/ACeGMOQVY
akomodi/ABGTQO
akra/ACGLMQY
albano/FGQ
alĝeriana/FGIQ
alia/ACGOQUY
alilitera/AG
alkoholo/GOYZ
altabla/AGQ
alti/GMVQ
amasega/AGOQ
ambigua/BCEGMOQsVY
amiki/BGMQVY
anonci/AGOSTz
apetito/GO
ara/ACGLOQ
aramea/FGQ
arĥaika/AGQV
artifika/AGQs
aŭdebla/G
avanci/AGMOV
balbuti/AGOUVB
batalpreta/ACG
belorusa/FGQ
blanka/ACeGOQUVY
boli/eGkV
bonodora/AGMO
bretona/FGQ
bruna/ACGOUVY
buteri/SGOT
ĉeĥa/CFGQY
certa/CEGMQVY
cikatra/AGOQ
cindro/AGHJO
dalmata/CFGQY
daŭri/BGOQV
dekstrema/AG
densega/AGJOQ
devi/AGOT
diferenci/GVY
diskreta/ACGMO
distingi/ABDGOLQTY
dolori/AGOT
drivi/AGOV
dubinda/AGVY
ebria/ACGMOQVUY
egalrajta/ACG
ekmemori/GT
eksofica/AGQ
ekvacio/AKGO
ekzota/ACGQVUYZ
elkesta/AGQ
elstari/ACGQVY
eminenta/ACGMQ
enbuŝa/AGQY
enkataloga/AG
enmana/AG
enŝlosi/AGOOT
entuziasmi/AGOQUVB
esperantisto/ACEFGKQ
esti/GMOQRUVvY
etaĝa/ANnG
etrusko/CFGQY
evolui/ABfGSOVyZ
fajri/CHGJLOVY
fari/ABDGORSQTY
feliĉa/AMGOUVY
fetiĉo/AGOQSZ
fieri/ACDGMOQUV
filo/FG
flandro/CFGQY
flosi/ASOLGVY
forgesi/ABGOQTJ
frakcii/AGOSTWZ
freŝa/ACGMOQVY
frui/GMQV
funkcii/GkRVy
garba/AKLGOJ
gea/ACGQ
ĝena/AGQs
ĝisdata/AG
gliti/AGLOVJ
grajno/ACeGOQY
grekkatoliko/CFGQY
ĝui/BDGL
haladzi/AGOQV
ĥaosa/AGOQV
hejma/AOCGPQW
hida/AGOQUY?
hispano/FQYG
hontegi/ADGOBV
humila/ACGMQU
ideala/ASGOZ
imuna/ACGOQ
industria/ASGOU
inklini/AGOQMV
interesi/GOQTY
interna/AGOPQY
intervoka/AGOQ
japano/CFGQY
juĝi/JGST
kaĉo/AGLO
kalva/ACGOQUY
kanoni/GKOSV
kapitala/AGSOZ
kazaĥo/CFGQY
klara/EeCGMOQY
koincidi/ACGOV
komforta/AGMOQY
kompleta/CEGMOQ
konciza/ACeGO
koni/AGkOQTy
konscii/GkOQRT
kontinua/ACGOSVY
kopto/CFGQY
kraki/AkGOV
krevi/AGOVz
krispa/AGOQ
kruda/ACGMUOQY
kuna/ACmGLQ
kurdo/CFGQY
kvieta/ACLGOQMZ
laca/ACeGMOQ
larĝa/ACeGMOQVY
laŭi/AGMTX
leĝo/GKOQS
libero/ACGMOQU
lingvoevoluo/AGO
litovo/CFGQY
longo/GMOQUY
magistro/FGQ
maksimuma/AGJOQSZ
malpaci/AGOQV
manĝi/ABafGjFOTY
martiro/CFGQ
membro/CFGKQ
milda/ACGMOQV
minusklo/AGOQ
misfama/AGOQ
mito/AGOY
mola/ACGMQY
mono/AGHO
multa/ACGMOQV
nacio/GOSWYZ
nebuleta/AOCGV
nepra/ACGMVY
neŭtrala/ASCGUZ
normala/CEGMOQUY
nuda/ACGhQSUYZ
oblikva/ACGQVOY
oestro/AGO
okazi/GJKOVY
onda/AGLOQV
orfo/CFGJV
ozono/AGOQ
paga/AGs
paralela/ACGOVYZ
parkera/AG
pasa/AGNOQY
pasiva/ACGs
peki/BGUV
penti/AGOV
perfektiva/ACGMOQ
perso/CFGPQY
piramida/AGOQ
plezuri/AGOQMVY
plipezo/AGQO
pluralo/AGO
poguta/AGL
populara/CEGMOQ
precizega/ACGMOY
primitiva/ACGOQSUYZ
profundi/CMOGQVY
propra/AGMQUY
pufo/AGOQ
putri/ABGJOQVY
rara/AGQY
redunda/ACGOQVY
rekoni/AGLOT
resti/AGOVY
ridinda/AGUY
ripozi/AGOVJ
ruĝeta/ACGOQY
rutina/BEGOQUYZ
ŝaki/AGOSV
salteti/AGORV
samnivela/AG
sani/ACGOMQUV
sarmato/CFGQY
scieti/GOQT
sekura/CEGLMO
senama/AGQ
senarta/AGQ
senbera/AG
sencela/AG
senceremonia/ACGQ
sendeva/AG
sendolora/AGQ
senegala/AGQ
senespera/ACGQ
senfantazia/AG
senfermenta/AGQ
senfroka/AGQ
senganta/AG
senglacia/AGL
senhalta/AGQ
senhezita/AGQ
senideala/AGQ
senindulga/AGQ
senintenca/AG
senkapa/AGQU
senkasta/AGQ
senkomforta/AGQ
senkonfuza/AGQ
senkora/AGQ
senkredita/AGQ
senkuraĝa/EGQ
senlima/AGQ
senmanka/AGQ
senmebla/AG
senmina/AG
senmorta/ACGQ
sennacia/AGSUZ
senodora/AGQ
senokupa/AGQ
senorela/AG
senpatra/AGQ
senperturba/AGQ
senpopola/AGQ
senpreza/AGQ
senradika/AGQ
senreva/AGQ
senrima/AGQ
senrusta/AGQ
senŝaŭma/AGQ
sensela/AG
sensimila/AG
sensoifa/AGQ
senŝua/AGQ
sentabua/AGQ
sentempa/AG
sentiva/AGOQ
senvianda/AG
senvoĉa/CGQ
serbo/CFGQY
silenta/BGLQUV
simpla/ACGMOQVUYZ
situi/AGOV
skrupula/AGOQsU
sloveno/CFGQYY
solida/CEGOMQY
sovaĝa/ACGJMQUVY
sperti/ACGOQUT
stabila/CEGLMOQ
starti/AGROV
stulta/ACGMUOQY
suba/AGOPQUXY
suborda/AGLO
suferi/eGjOT÷
sunbruna/AGOQ
supri/AadGMVQ
surda/ACGQU
suriri/AGT
surŝipa/AGQ
svahila/AGPY
sviso/CFGQY
tabela/AGKOW
terenfali/AGOV
tinta/AGO
torturi/AGJLOST
tradukinda/CEGOQRY
transiri/AGJT
tributi/AGOTUY
troa/AGMOVXY
turkmeno/CFGQY
tutmajuskla/ACGQY
unita/AGO
ununombro/AGOY
utilega/AGMOY
vakua/EGOV
vapora/ALGOQVY
varmi/ACeJLMGOQVY
vea/ADGOVX
venki/AGOQMTz
verva/AGOQs
vico/GOQ
vigli/ACGQMVO
vivanta/CGQY
voĉi/CGQV
zorgi/ABDFGMOT
